Utah statutes.
17-24-5.   Payment of warrants in order presented -- Nonpayment of warrants
-- Interest.
The county treasurer shall pay all warrants in the order presented and as
funds are available.  When any warrant is presented to the treasurer for
payment and is not paid for want of funds, the warrant shall bear interest at
the rate of 5% per annum until paid.
